Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1917.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2707.3. Indigenous Americans fishing licenses.(a) Acknowledgment.--The General Assembly acknowledges that:(1) The Commonwealth is unceded territory to the federally recognized Lenape, Shawnee and Seneca-Cayuga nations.(2) Hunting and fishing rights were never ceded by native nations to the Commonwealth.(3) The citizens of the federally recognized Lenape tribes, Shawnee, Seneca-Cayuga, Onondaga, Oneida, Mohawk and Tuscarora nations should be granted the right to hunt and 12345678910111213141516171819 fish freely in this Commonwealth.(b) Issuing of licenses.--Indigenous American fishing licenses shall be issued by the commission, county treasurer or issuing agent to an individual who is a formally recognized member of a federally recognized indigenous tribe. Before the issuance of a license under this chapter, an individual must provide at least one of the following forms of documentation in addition to a valid photo identification card:(1) A certificate of Degree of Indian or Alaska Native Blood.(2) A written statement from an official of the federally recognized indigenous tribe from which the individual or the individual's ancestors originated.(3) Genealogical documentation showing that the individual:(i) lineally descends from an ancestor who was a member of a federally recognized indigenous tribe from which the individual claims descent; or(ii) was legally adopted or married into the federally recognized indigenous tribe from which the individual claims descent.(c) Fee.--The commission, county treasurer or issuing agent may not charge a fee for a license after presentation of the required documentation under this section.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "federally recognized indigenous tribe" means an American Indian or Alaska Native tribal entity that is recognized as having a government-to-government relationship with the United States, with the responsibilities, powers, limitations and obligations attached to that designation.20250HB1917PN2400 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. Section 2706 of Title 34 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2706. Resident license and fee exemptions.* * *(i) Indigenous Americans hunting licenses.--(1) The General Assembly acknowledges that:(i) The Commonwealth is unceded territory to the federally recognized Lenape, Shawnee and Seneca-Cayuga nations.(ii) Hunting and fishing rights were never ceded by native nations to the Commonwealth.(iii) The citizens of the federally recognized Lenape tribes, Shawnee, Seneca-Cayuga, Onondaga, Oneida, Mohawk and Tuscarora nations should be granted the right to hunt and fish freely in this Commonwealth.(2) Indigenous American hunting licenses shall be issued by the commission, county treasurer or issuing agent to an individual who is a formally recognized member of a federally recognized indigenous tribe. Before the issuance of a license under this subsection, an individual must provide at least one of the following forms of documentation in addition to a valid photo identification card:(i) a certificate of Degree of Indian or Alaska Native Blood;(ii) a written statement from an official of the federally recognized indigenous tribe from which the individual or the individual's ancestors originated; or(iii) genealogical documentation showing that the individual:(A) lineally descends from an ancestor who was a 20250HB1917PN2400 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 member of the federally recognized indigenous tribe from which the individual claims descent; or(B) was legally adopted or married into the federally recognized indigenous tribe from which the individual claims descent.(3) The commission, county treasurer or issuing agent may not charge a fee for this license after presentation of the required documentation under this subsection.(4) As used in this subsection, the term "federally recognized indigenous tribe" means an American Indian or Alaska Native tribal entity that is recognized as having a government-to-government relationship with the United States, with the responsibilities, powers, limitations and obligations attached to that designation.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1917PN2400 - 4 - 123456789101112131415